apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="long/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="happ/y__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iest</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sly/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sh/y__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iest</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yer</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yest</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nice/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="big/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ger</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hot/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>test</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="thin/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dim/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="common/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lovel/y__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ier</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iest</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="handsome/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/good__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>good</l>      <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>better</l>    <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>best</l>      <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/bad__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>bad</l>       <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>worse</l>     <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>worst</l>     <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/ar__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urther</l>    <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urthest</l>   <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arther</l>    <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arthest</l>   <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="glad/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>der</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="broad/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="drab/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ber</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>best</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="flat/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>test</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fun/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="glum/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="up/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>per</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pitiful/__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mine__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="meag/re__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="second__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="maybe__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="where__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="very__preadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ii__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ly</l>        <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ic/y__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ily</l>       <r>y<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bad">             <i></i><par n="/bad__adj"/></e>
<e lm="good">            <i></i><par n="/good__adj"/></e>
<e lm="big">             <i>big</i><par n="big/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="broad">           <i>broad</i><par n="broad/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="drab">            <i>drab</i><par n="drab/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="extreme">         <i>extreme</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="far">             <i>f</i><par n="f/ar__adj"/></e>
<e lm="far-right">       <i>far-right</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="feisty">          <i>feist</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fine">            <i>fine</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fit">             <i>fit</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="flat" c="(US)">   <i>flat</i><par n="flat/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fond">            <i>fond</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forty-fourth">    <i>forty-fourth</i><par n="second__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fun">             <i>fun</i><par n="fun/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glib">            <i>glib</i><par n="drab/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glum">            <i>glum</i><par n="dim/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gray" c="(US)">   <i>gray</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grey" c="(GB)">   <i>grey</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grim">            <i>grim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="handsome">        <i>handsome</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hot">             <i>hot</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lacklustre">      <i>lacklust</i><par n="meag/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="likely">          <i>likel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lively">          <i>livel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lofty">           <i>loft</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mad">             <i>mad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mine">            <i>mine</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
<e lm="moral">           <i>moral</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="not bad">         <i>not<b/></i><par n="/bad__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pitiful">         <i>pitiful</i><par n="pitiful/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="plain">           <i>plain</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="red">             <i>red</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rude">            <i>rude</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sad">             <i>sad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="seventy-fifth">   <i>seventy-fifth</i><par n="second__adj"/></e>
<e lm="shy">             <i>sh</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sly">             <i>sl</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="slim">            <i>slim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="snug">            <i>snug</i><par n="big/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spare">           <i>spare</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stiff">           <i>stiff</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tan">             <i>tan</i><par n="thin/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="theirs">          <i>theirs</i><par n="mine__adj"/></e>
<e lm="thin">            <i>thin</i><par n="thin/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="thirsty">         <i>thirst</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unlikely">        <i>unlikel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="warty">           <i>warty</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wet">             <i>wet</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="white">           <i>white</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wry">             <i>wr</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wrong">           <i>wrong</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="downwind">        <i>downwind</i><par n="ii__adv"/></e>
<e lm="godly">           <i>godl</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hither">          <i>hither</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="irritating">      <i>irritating</i><par n="ii__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tightly">         <i>tightly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="unkindly">        <i>unkindl</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="what kind of">    <i>what<b/>kind<b/>of</i><par n="where__adv"/></e>
<e lm="whereof">         <i>whereof</i><par n="where__adv"/></e>
<e lm="both">            <i>both</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="except">          <i>except</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="most">            <i>most</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="really">          <i>really</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
